Utah statutes.
19-2-119.   Civil or criminal remedies not excluded -- Actionable rights under chapter -- No liability for acts of God or other catastrophes.

(1)  Existing civil or criminal remedies for any wrongful action which is a violation of any part of the law are not excluded by this chapter.

(2)  Persons other than the state or the board do not acquire actionable rights by virtue of this chapter.

(3)  The liabilities imposed for violation of this chapter are not imposed for any violation caused by an act of God, war, strike, riot, or other catastrophe.

